Utah statutes.
48-2a-1004.   Expenses.
If a derivative action is successful, in whole or in part, or if anything is
received by the plaintiff as a result of a judgment, compromise, or settlement
of an action or claim, the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses,
including reasonable attorneys' fees, and shall direct him to remit to the
limited partnership the remainder of those proceeds received by him.
